Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska8-1113
False or misleading filings; unlawful.

It shall be unlawful for any person to make or cause to be made, in any document filed with the director or in any proceeding under the Securities Act of Nebraska, any statement which is, at the time and in the light of the circumstances under which it is made, false or misleading in any material respect.

Laws 1965, c. 549, § 13, p. 1790;

Laws 1998, LB 894, § 2.